District of Columbia statutes.
8-1063

Moratorium.

There shall be a moratorium on the issuance or acceptance of the application for any new solid waste facility permits until after the Solid Waste Transfer Facility Site Selection Advisory Panel submits its report to the Council and the Council acts on the Panel’s recommendations by identifying tracts of land appropriate for solid waste transfer, or, amending the operating requirements established in this chapter.

History

Feb. 27, 1996, D.C. Law 11-94, § 11c
as added June 11, 1999, D.C. Law 12-286, § 2(f), 46 DCR 3435

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3463.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Solid Waste Disposal Fee Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-173, September 29, 2006, law notification 53 DCR 8609).